Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 1 General Provisions
21-5-7.1.
Technical defects in filings; determination; notice to the subject of the complaint and opportunity to correct the defect; administrative fee; dismissal of complaints where best efforts have been made to complete a filing.

The commission shall adopt rules which shall provide that:

Upon the commission’s receipt of a complaint, a determination shall be made as to whether the complaint relates to a technical defect in a filing. For this purpose, a technical defect shall include, but not be limited to, a defect such as an incorrect date or a failure to include a date, an incorrect contributor’s occupation or a failure to include a contributor’s occupation, an incorrect address or e-mail address or a failure to include an address or e-mail address, an incorrect employer or a failure to include an employer, accounting errors, or any other similar defects;

When the commission determines that a complaint relates to a technical defect in a filing, the subject of the complaint shall be issued a notice of the technical defect by certified mail, return receipt requested, or statutory overnight delivery and shall be given a period of 30 calendar days from the receipt of the notice to correct the technical defect. During the 30 day period the complaint shall be considered as received by the commission but not yet filed with the commission and shall not be considered a violation of this chapter. If during the 30 day period the technical defect is cured by an amended filing or otherwise, or if during the 30 day period the subject of the complaint demonstrates that there is no technical defect as alleged, the complaint shall be disposed of without filing or further proceedings and no penalty shall be imposed. If the subject of the complaint fails to respond to the notice of a technical defect, make an amended filing, or demonstrate that there is no technical defect as alleged by the thirty-first day, the commission shall impose and collect an administrative fee not to exceed $50.00 per technical defect. For the purposes of the penalties imposed by this paragraph, the same error or inaccurate entry shall be considered a single technical violation if the error or inaccurate entry appears multiple times on a single report or causes further errors or inaccurate entries in that report or in any future reports;

If the subject of the complaint does not pay the administrative fee required by paragraph (2) of this Code section, if any, and does not otherwise also comply with paragraph (2) of this Code section by the sixtieth day from the receipt of the notice of a technical defect, the commission shall conduct further investigation and the complaint may proceed further in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; and

When the commission determines in its discretion that best efforts have been made to complete a required filing, said filing shall be considered in compliance with this Code section and any complaint relative to said filing shall be dismissed.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 7/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 6/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-8.
Venue.

Venue for prosecution of civil violations of this chapter or for any other action by or on behalf of the commission shall be in the county of the residence of the candidate or public officer at the time of the alleged violation or action.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1.

21-5-9.
Penalties.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who knowingly fails to comply with or who knowingly violates this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The provisions of this Code section shall not preclude prosecution and punishment for the commission of any felony offense as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 603, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 173, § 6/SB 199.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

21-5-9.1.
Prerequisite to seeking election or reelection to General Assembly.

No person who has served or is serving as a member of the General Assembly shall be eligible to qualify to seek election or reelection to the General Assembly until and unless all fines and fees owing to the commission have been paid, all disclosure reports due have been filed, and all outstanding taxes have been paid.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 6A/SB 120.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective March 2, 2022.

21-5-10.
Chapter as continuation of laws; effect of enactment.

The provisions of this chapter, so far as they are the same as those of existing laws, are intended as a continuation of such laws and not as new enactments. The repeal by this chapter of any Act of the General Assembly, or part thereof, shall not revive any Act, or part thereof, heretofore repealed or superseded. This chapter shall not affect any act done, liability or penalty incurred, or right accrued or vested prior to the taking effect of this chapter; nor shall this chapter affect any actions or prosecution then pending, or to be instituted, to enforce any right or penalty then accrued or to punish any offense theretofore committed.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 8.

21-5-11.
Acceptance by public officers of monetary fees or honoraria.

No public officer other than a public officer elected state wide shall accept a monetary fee or honorarium in excess of $100.00 for a speaking engagement, participation in a seminar, discussion panel, or other activity which directly relates to the official duties of that public officer or the office of that public officer.

No public officer elected state wide shall accept any monetary fee or honorarium for a speaking engagement, participation in a seminar, discussion panel, or other such activity.

For purposes of this chapter, actual and reasonable expenses for food, beverages, travel, lodging, and registration for a meeting which are provided to permit participation in a panel or speaking engagement at the meeting shall not be monetary fees or honoraria.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 7/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1992 enactment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

21-5-12.
Connected organizations.

The name of each political action committee shall include the name of its connected organization.

The name of any separate segregated fund, as defined in Code Section 21-5-40, shall include the name of its connected organization.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 8/HB 48.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-13.
Limitation of actions.

Any action alleging a violation of this chapter shall be commenced within three years after the date on which the violation, wrongful action, or omission occurred, unless otherwise provided by subsections (b) or (c) of this Code section.

Any action alleging a violation involving any person elected to serve for a term of four or more years, but fewer than six years, or involving any candidate for an office with a term of four, but fewer than six years, shall be commenced within five years after the date on which the violation, wrongful action, or omission occurred.

Any action alleging a violation of this chapter involving any person elected to serve a term of six or more years or involving any candidate for an office with a term of six or more years shall be commenced within seven years after the date on which the violation, wrongful act, or omission occurred.

For purposes of this Code section, an action shall be deemed to have commenced against a person only when either:

A complaint has been accepted by the commission in compliance with Code Section 21-5-7; or

The commission or Attorney General serves on such person a notice of summons or hearing, in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” that alleges that such person has violated this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 9/HB 48; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 8/SB 17; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 7/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, rewrote this Code section, which formerly read: “Any action alleging a violation of this chapter shall be commenced within three years after the date of filing of the first report containing the alleged violation; provided, however, that any action alleging a violation of this chapter shall be commenced within five years after the date of filing of the first report containing the alleged violation involving any person elected to serve for a term of four or more years or any candidate for an office with a term of four or more years. For purposes of this Code section, an action shall be deemed to have commenced against a person only when either:

“(1)
A complaint has been accepted by the commission in compliance with Code Section 21-5-7; or

“(2)
The commission or Attorney General serves on such person a notice of summons or hearing, in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the ‘Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,’ that alleges that such person has violated this chapter.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-14.
E-mail address reporting requirements; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, each individual required by this chapter to file a report or disclosure statement with the commission shall provide the commission, in writing, with a current e-mail address and shall advise the commission, in writing, of any change to such address within ten days of any change to such address. Such information shall be provided to the commission prior to January 31 each year.

City, county, and school board officials are not required to provide an e-mail address to the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 9/SB 17; Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 2/HB 232.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that
this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 10/HB 232, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is the express intention of the General Assembly that this Act be applied retroactively to January 10, 2011, as well as prospectively.” This Act became effective March 15, 2011.

21-5-15.
Notice to local officials regarding certain actions to be given by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

When the commission gives notice to a local official referred to in subparagraph (F) or (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3 of any of the actions listed in this Code section, such notice shall be given by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery. This Code section shall apply with respect to any notice of: the filing of a complaint; a technical defect in a filing; a failure to make a timely filing; or a late fee or other penalty.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 3/HB 232.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 19, § 10/HB 232, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval. It is the express intention of the General Assembly that this Act be applied retroactively to January 10, 2011, as well as prospectively.” This Act became effective March 15, 2011.